Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,288
Fair market value of total gross
assets; adjustment.

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section, the fair
market value of total gross assets at the time of the merger or consolidation
shall increase annually at a rate equal to the sum of:

(a) The prime rate as
listed in the first edition of the Wall Street Journal published for each
calendar year since the merger or consolidation, unless the prime rate is
not published in that edition of the Wall Street Journal, in which case any
reasonable determination of the prime rate on the first day of the year may
be used; and

(b)
One percent.

(2)
The rate found in subsection (1) of this section shall not be compounded.

(3) The adjustment of
the fair market value of total gross assets shall continue as provided in
subsection (1) of this section until the date the adjusted value is first
exceeded by the cumulative amounts of successor asbestos-related liabilities
paid or committed to be paid by or on behalf of the successor corporation
or a predecessor or by or on behalf of a transferor after the time of the
merger or consolidation for which the fair market value of total gross assets
is being determined.

(4)
No adjustment of the fair market value of total gross assets shall be applied
to any liability insurance that is included in total gross assets under subsection
(3) of section 25-21,287.

Laws 2010, LB763, § 6.